Hawaii statutes.
§150A-42 Certificate. (a) An importer
requesting a certificate under this part shall complete and submit an
application to the department providing information as required by rule.

(b) Fees may be assessed for the processing
and issuance of a certificate and for inspections related to the certificate,
as established by rule and shall be deposited into the pest inspection,
quarantine, and eradication fund. Fees may vary according to the type of
certification issued and the costs incurred for inspections.

(c) A certificate issued under this part shall
be valid for no more than two years from date of issuance. A certified
importer may reapply for certification pursuant to subsection (a). [L 1999, c
177, pt of §1; am L 2010, c 173, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next